Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB518.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 67.767 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) 1. The Secretary of State shall prescribe separate[a] standard [form or ]forms, through
promulgation of an administrative regulation in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A, which
[shall be accepted by all tax districts and ]shall allow for:
a. A combined net profits and gross receipts occupational license taxes return or separate
forms for a net profits occupational license tax return and a gross receipts occupational
license tax return by all business entities; and
b. A payroll occupational license tax return, for returns of payroll taxes by all business
entities[returns of net profits and gross receipts occupational license taxes by all business
entities unless the tax district opts out from acceptance in accordance with subsection (2)
of this section or is exempted under subsection (3) of this section].
2. For business entities to have the information necessary to ensure the proper payment of the
taxes to each tax district, the Secretary shall also develop and update as necessary:
a. Instructions [or a set of instructions ]for business entities on the completion of the
standard [form or ]forms; and
b. Fillable portable document format versions of each of the standardized forms developed
pursuant to subparagraph 1. of this paragraph[so that business entities have the current
information necessary to ensure the proper payment of the tax to each tax district].
(b) The Secretary shall seek advice and comments on the development, amendment, and maintenance of
the [form or ]forms and instructions from an advisory committee chaired by the Secretary, or his or her
designee, that is composed of:
1. One (1) member of the Secretary of State's staff;
2. Two (2) members submitted by the Kentucky League of Cities;
3. Two (2) members submitted by the Kentucky Association of Counties, at least one (1) of which
shall be a current elected county judge/executive;
4. Two (2) members submitted by the Kentucky Society of Certified Public Accountants;
5. One (1) member submitted by the Kentucky Association of County Treasurers and Finance
Officers;
6. One (1) member submitted by the Associated General Contractors of Kentucky;
7. One (1) member submitted by the Kentucky Association of Master Contractors;
8. One (1) member submitted by the National Federation of Independent Business;
9. One (1) member submitted by the Associated Builders and Contractors of Indiana/Kentucky;
10. Two (2) members submitted by the Kentucky Occupational License Association; and
11. One (1) member submitted by the Kentucky School Boards Association.
(c) The advisory committee shall:
1. Meet at the call of the chair;
2. Convene before August 31, 2026, for the first meeting, and as necessary thereafter;
3. Develop any new forms, returns, and instructions required in this subsection before June 1,
2027; and
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
4. File the completed forms to the Legislative Research Committee for referral to the Interim
Joint Committee on Local Government by June 24, 2027.
(d) Within fourteen (14) days after the July 2027 Interim Joint Committee on Local Government
meeting, the Secretary of State shall submit a proposed administrative regulation to the Legislative
Research Committee in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A, which includes the forms and electronic
links required in this subsection.
(e) This subsection shall not be interpreted to require the development or adoption of a new form if the
Secretary of the State determines that an existing form satisfies the requirements of paragraph (a) of
this subsection. [a representative from the Kentucky Association of Counties, the Kentucky League of
Cities, the Kentucky Occupational License Association, the Kentucky School Boards Association, the
Kentucky Society of Certified Public Accountants, urban-county governments, and consolidated local
governments, and a representative of business entities appointed by the Secretary.
(c) During the development of the proposed initial form or forms, the Secretary of State shall report in
writing to the Interim Joint Committee on Local Government on the progress of the development
process. When the proposed administrative regulation is filed with the Legislative Research
Commission pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A, the Secretary of State shall also submit a copy thereof, via
regular or electronic mail, to the members of the Interim Joint Committee on Local Government or, if
during a session of the General Assembly, to the members of the House Standing Committee on Local
Government and the Senate Standing Committee on State and Local Government. The submission to
the members shall include a note from the Secretary of State stating that the members may submit any
comments regarding the proposed administrative regulation in accordance with the deadline established
in KRS 13A.270(1)(c).
(d) Notwithstanding KRS 13A.290(6)(a), after full review by the Administrative Regulation Review
Subcommittee, the Legislative Research Commission shall assign the administrative regulation to the
Interim Joint Committee on Local Government for consideration or, if during a session of the General
Assembly, to the House Standing Committee on Local Government and the Senate Standing Committee
on State and Local Government.]
(f)[(e)] Once the standard[ form or] forms are adopted or amended, the Secretary of State shall include
the[ form or] forms, instructions, electronic links to the fillable portable document format versions of
the forms, and any updates on the one-stop business portal or another public website maintained by that
office, along with information submitted to the Secretary of State pursuant to subsection (2) or (3) of
this section. The[ form or] forms and instructions shall be updated and maintained by the Secretary of
State at no cost to the tax districts. A[No] fee shall not be levied against the public or businesses for
accessing and downloading forms, instructions, or other information maintained by the Secretary of
State under this section.
(2) After the[ form or] forms are adopted under subsection (1) of this section but prior to July 1, 2029[July 1,
2017], a tax district shall:
(a) [may ]Adopt the standard[ form or] forms as its exclusive electronic return[ form or] forms;[,]
(b) [may ]Accept the standard[ form or] forms electronically in addition to the tax district's own return
form or forms; or
(c) 1. Opt out from adopting or using the forms in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection if it has:
a. An online filing and payment system in use on or before January 1, 2025; or
b. Entered into a binding contract for the implementation of an online filing and payment
system on or before July 1, 2026.
2. If a tax district opts out under subparagraph 1. of this paragraph, in addition to providing
online access to the electronic filing and payment system it uses on its own website that
permits the electronic submission of forms and the electronic remittance of payments, and in
order to maintain its exemption, it shall provide:
a. An electronic link to access its online filing and payment system[, or may elect to opt out
of accepting the standard form or forms through adoption of a written order by the tax
district's governing body. If a tax district elects not to accept the standard form or forms, it

CHAPTER 44 3
shall forward the following information] to the Secretary of State for inclusion on the one-
stop business portal or another public website maintained by that office;[:]
b.[(a)] A copy of the written order specifying that the tax district has a qualifying online filing
system in use and will not accept the standard[ form or] forms within thirty (30) days of
its adoption; and
c.[(b)] A copy of occupational license tax forms that the tax district accepts, any accompanying
instructions, and any future amendments to those forms, [and ]instructions, and electronic
links within thirty (30) days of any change.
(3) A tax district that accepts the standard forms for filing under subsection (2)(a) or (b) of this section shall
have nine (9) months from the final approval date of an administrative regulation establishing any new or
amended standard forms to comply with the provisions of those subsections.
(4)[(3)] After July 1, 2029[July 1, 2017], a tax district:
(a) Shall either adopt the standard[ form or] forms as its exclusive electronic return[ form or] forms or
accept the standard [form or ]forms in addition to the tax district's own return form or forms, unless:
1.[(a)] The tax district submits a written request approved by the tax district's governing body to the
Secretary of State for an exemption based on documented information that:
a. Acceptance of the form will impose an undue financial hardship on the tax district; or
b. The tax district is part of an interlocal agreement that provides for a single tax
collection process for multiple jurisdictions; and
2.[(b)] The Secretary of State approves the request for an exemption and obtains the return[ form or]
forms that will be accepted by the tax district and any applicable instructions for inclusion on the
one-stop business portal or another public website maintained by that office. In exercising his or
her discretion to grant an exemption under this subsection, the Secretary of State may impose
any reasonable terms and limitations upon the exemption;
(b) Shall provide on its official website or other means for business entities to access and download the
forms, returns, instructions, and methods of acceptable electronic payment of its occupational license
taxes in a way that the forms and returns may be electronically completed and submitted to the tax
district by the taxpayer;
(c) Shall allow a taxpayer who files the forms or returns electronically to pay the tax due with the form
or return by an automated clearinghouse electronic funds transfer directly to the tax district's
designated depository account or by any other approved electronic method;
(d) May charge and collect from the taxpayer an additional electronic processing fee and any fee or
surcharge to recover the actual costs incurred by the taxing district in connection with the electronic
filing, processing, security, maintenance, and acceptance of electronic payments, including costs
imposed by third party vendors or financial institutions;
(e) Shall provide an electronic receipt to the taxpayer upon the successful electronic filing of the form or
return and payment; and
(f) If approved by an annual application with the Secretary of State, shall not be subject to the
provisions of paragraphs (b) to (f) of this subsection if the tax district:
1. Collected less than two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) during the immediately
preceding fiscal year from the combined levy of all types of occupational license taxes in the
immediately preceding fiscal year; or
2. Submits reasonable evidence that the cost of compliance with this paragraph would exceed
more than five percent (5%) of the taxing district's total annual budget.
(5)[(4)] Upon receipt of an order pursuant to subsection (2) of this section or upon the issuance of an exemption
under subsection (4)[(3)] of this section, the Secretary of State shall provide notice to the Kentucky Society of
Certified Public Accountants of the tax districts that have submitted a written order to opt out under subsection
(2) of this section or that are granted an exemption under subsection (4)[(3)] of this section.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

4 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(6)[(5)] The Secretary of State shall[, only upon the request of a tax district,] include electronic links for the
electronic[ filing of] downloading of forms and electronic links for the online tax filing payment system
provided to it under this section on the one-stop business portal or other website maintained by the
Secretary of State within thirty (30) of receipt from the tax district[ with the local tax district by no later than
July 1, 2017].
(7)[(6)] Nothing in this section or KRS 67.766 shall be interpreted to alter or preempt the requirements imposed
by a tax district regarding deadlines, reporting, rates, or other legally imposed procedures regarding the
imposition, administration, and collection of local occupational license taxes by a tax district. Nor shall the
adoption or use of a standard[ form or] forms developed under this section release the taxpayer from any
liability or responsibility to the tax district for the correct payment of taxes, penalties, and any other
obligations imposed by the tax district. This section and KRS 67.766 shall not be interpreted to authorize the
collection of local tax revenues by the state government or any other agency of the state.
Signed by Governor April 7, 2026.